Vermont, session 2025-2026, S78.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 9 V.S.A. chapter 111B is added to read:
CHAPTER 111B. TRADE COMMISSIONS
§ 4129. VERMONT-IRELAND TRADE COMMISSION
(a) The Vermont-Ireland Trade Commission is established within the State
Treasurer’s office to advance bilateral trade and investment between Vermont
and Ireland. The Commission shall consist of 10 members as follows:
(1) three members, appointed by the Governor;
(2) three members, appointed by the Speaker of the House;
VT LEG #380308 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.78
2025 Page 2 of 4
(3) three members, appointed by the Senate Committee on Committees;
and
(4) the State Treasurer or designee.
(b) The purposes of the Vermont-Ireland Trade Commission are to:
(1) advance bilateral trade and investment between Vermont and
Ireland;
(2) initiate joint action on policy issues of mutual interest to Vermont
and Ireland;
(3) promote business and academic exchanges between Vermont and
Ireland;
(4) encourage mutual economic support between Vermont and Ireland;
(5) encourage mutual investment in the infrastructure of Vermont and
Ireland; and
(6) address other issues as determined by the Commission.
(c) The members of the Commission, except for the State Treasurer or
designee, shall be appointed for terms of four years each and shall continue to
serve until their successors are appointed, except that in order to achieve
staggered terms, the three members appointed by the Governor shall serve
initial terms of two years each and the three members appointed by the Speaker
of the House shall serve initial terms of three years each. Members may be
VT LEG #380308 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.78
2025 Page 3 of 4
reappointed. A member serves at the pleasure of the member’s appointing
authority.
(d) A vacancy in the membership of the Commission shall be filled by the
relevant appointing authority within 90 days after the vacancy.
(e) The Commission shall select a chair from among its members at the
first meeting. The Chair, as appropriate, may appoint from among the
Commission members subcommittees or a subcommittee at the Chair’s
discretion. A majority of the members of the Commission shall constitute a
quorum for purposes of transacting the business of the Commission.
(f) The Commission shall submit a written report with its findings, results,
and recommendations to the Governor and the General Assembly within one
year of its initial organizational meeting and on or before December 1 of each
succeeding year for the activities of the current calendar year.
(g) The Vermont-Ireland Trade Commission is authorized to raise funds,
through direct solicitation or other fundraising events, alone or with other
groups, and accept donations, grants, and bequests from individuals,
corporations, foundations, governmental agencies, and public and private
organizations and institutions, to defray the Commission’s administrative
expenses and to carry out its purposes as set forth in this chapter. The funds,
donations, grants, or bequests received pursuant to this chapter shall be
deposited in a bank account and allocated annually by the State Treasurer’s
VT LEG #380308 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.78
2025 Page 4 of 4
office to defray the Commission’s administrative expenses and carry out its
purposes. Any monies so withdrawn shall not be used for any purpose other
than the payment of expenses under this chapter. Interest earned shall remain
in the bank account.
(h) Members of the Commission shall not receive compensation or be
entitled to reimbursement of expenses by the State of Vermont for their service
on the Commission.
Sec. 2. INITIAL APPOINTMENT DEADLINE FOR VERMONT-IRELAND
TRADE COMMISSION
Initial appointments to the Vermont-Ireland Trade Commission shall be
made not later than October 1, 2025.
Sec. 3. REPEAL; VERMONT-IRELAND TRADE COMMISSION
9 V.S.A. § 4129 (Vermont-Ireland Trade Commission) as added by this act
is repealed on June 30, 2030.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380308 v.1